Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,134
Historical vehicle; registered with regular license plates; when.

Any motor vehicle or trailer that qualifies as an historical vehicle which is used for the same general purposes and under the same conditions as motor vehicles or trailers registered with regular license plates shall be required to be registered with regular license plates, regardless of its age, and shall be subject to the payment of the same taxes and fees required of motor vehicles or trailers registered with regular license plates.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 134.